Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2846.01
Validation, defined.

Validation means the action of a certified pharmacy technician checking the accuracy and completeness of the acts, tasks, or functions undertaken by another certified pharmacy technician as provided in section 38-2891.01.

Laws 2019, LB74, § 4.